North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-33 Nonprofit Corporations
10-33-69.
Record date — Determining members entitled to notice and vote.

The board may fix a date not more than fifty days, or a shorter time period provided in the articles or bylaws, before the date of a meeting of members as the date for the determination of the members entitled to notice of and entitled to vote at the meeting. When a date is fixed, only members with voting rights on that date are entitled to notice of and permitted to vote at that meeting of members.

A determination of members entitled to notice and to vote at a membership meeting is effective for an adjournment of the meeting unless the board fixes a new date for determining the right to notice and to vote, which it must do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than fifty days after the record date for determining members entitled to notice of the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty days after the date fixed for the original meeting, the court may provide that the original record date for notice and voting continues in effect or the court may fix a new record date for notice and voting.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-70.
Members’ list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for notice of and voting at a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of its members who are entitled to notice and to vote. The list must show the address and number of votes each member is entitled to vote at the meeting.

The list of members must be available for inspection by a member with voting rights for the purpose of communication with other members concerning the meeting, beginning two business days after the meeting notice is given and continuing through the meeting, at the principal executive office of the corporation or at a reasonable place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held.

The list also must be available at the meeting.

A member, a member’s agent, or attorney is entitled on written demand to inspect and to copy the list, at a reasonable time and at the member’s expense, during the period it is available for inspection and at any time during the meeting or an adjournment.

If the corporation refuses to allow a member with voting rights, the member’s agent, or attorney to inspect the list of members before or at the meeting, the district court of the county where the principal executive office of the corporation is located, on application of the member, may:

Order the inspection or copying at the corporation’s expense;

Postpone the meeting until the inspection or copying is complete; or

Order the corporation to pay the member’s costs, including reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred to obtain the order.

Unless a written demand to inspect and copy a membership list has been made under subsection 2 before the membership meeting and a corporation improperly refuses to comply with the demand, refusal or failure to comply with this section does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

A member, agent, or attorney who gains access to a membership list under this section may not use or give to another for use the membership list for any purpose other than a proper purpose. Upon application of the corporation, the district court may issue a protective order or order other relief necessary to enforce this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-71.
Right to vote.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, each member with voting rights is entitled to one vote on each matter voted on by the members. If a membership stands of record in the names of two or more persons, their acts with respect to voting have the following effect:

If only one votes, the act binds all.

If more than one votes, the vote must be divided on a pro rata basis.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-72.
Act of the members.

Unless this chapter or the articles or bylaws require a greater vote or voting by class and except for the election of directors which is governed by section 10-32.1-45, the members shall take action by the affirmative vote of the greater of:

A majority of the members with voting rights present and entitled to vote on that item of business; or

A majority of the voting power of the minimum number of members with voting rights that would constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at the meeting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, members may take action at a meeting:

By voice or ballot.

By action without a meeting pursuant to section 10-33-73.

By ballot pursuant to section 10-33-74.

By remote communication pursuant to section 10-33-75.

If the articles or bylaws require a larger proportion or number than is required by this chapter for a particular action, then the articles or bylaws control.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 104; 2015, ch. 87, § 22, effective July 1, 2015.

10-33-72.1.
Contractual requirement to submit a matter to the members.

A corporation may agree to submit a matter to its members whether or not the board determines, at any time after approving the matter, that the matter is no longer advisable and recommends that the members reject it.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 101, § 65.

10-33-73.
Member action without a meeting.

An action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the members may be taken without a meeting by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by all of the members entitled to vote on that action.

If the articles so provide, any action may be taken by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by the members who hold voting power equal to the voting power that would be required to take the same action at a meeting of the members at which all members were present. However, in no event may written action be taken by members who hold less than a majority of the voting power of all members entitled to vote on that action.

After the adoption of the initial articles, an amendment to the articles to permit written action to be taken by less than all members requires the approval of all members entitled to vote on the amendment.

When written action is permitted to be taken by less than all members, all members must be notified immediately of its text and effective date no later than five days after the effective time of the action.

Failure to provide the notice does not invalidate the written action.

A member who does not sign or consent to the written action has no liability for the action or actions taken by the written action.

The written action is effective when signed by the required members, unless a different effective time is provided in the written action.

When this chapter requires or permits a certificate concerning an action to be filed with the secretary of state, the certificate must indicate if the action was taken under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 104; 2005, ch. 100, § 105; 2007, ch. 101, § 66.

10-33-74.
Member action by ballot.

Except as provided in subsection 5 and unless prohibited or limited by the articles or bylaws, an action that may be taken at a regular or special meeting of members may be taken without a meeting if the corporation mails or delivers a ballot to every member entitled to vote on the matter.

A ballot must set forth each proposed action and provide an opportunity to vote for or against each proposed action.

Approval by ballot under this section is valid only if:

The number of votes cast by ballot equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action; and

The number of approvals equals or exceeds the number of votes that would be required to approve the matter at a meeting at which the total number of votes cast was the same as the number of votes cast by ballot.

Solicitations for votes by ballot must:

Indicate the number of responses needed to meet the quorum requirements;

State the percentage of approvals necessary to approve each matter other than election of directors; and

Specify the time by which a ballot must be received by the corporation in order to be counted.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, a ballot may not be revoked.

With respect to a ballot by electronic communication:

A corporation may deliver a ballot by electronic communication only if the corporation complies with subsection 4 of section 10-33-68 as if the ballot were a notice.

Consent by a member to receive notice by electronic communication in a certain manner constitutes consent to receive a ballot by electronic communication in the same manner.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 106.

10-33-75.
Remote communications for member meetings.

This section shall be construed and applied to:

Facilitate remote communication consistent with the applicable law; and

Be consistent with reasonable practices concerning remote communication and with continued expansion of these practices.

Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws:

A meeting of the members may be held solely by one or more means of remote communication:

If notice of the meeting is given to every member entitled to vote; and

If the number of voting members participating in the meeting is sufficient to constitute a quorum at a meeting.

A member not physically present at a regular or special meeting of members may by means of remote communication participate in a meeting of members held at a designated place.

In any meeting of members held solely by means of remote communication under subdivision a of subsection 2 or in any meeting of members held at a designated place in which one or more members participate by means of remote communication under subdivision b of subsection 2:

The corporation shall implement reasonable measures:

To verify that each person deemed present and entitled to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a member; and

To provide each member participating by means of remote communication with a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting, including an opportunity to:

Read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with those proceedings;

If allowed by the procedures governing the meeting, have the member’s remarks heard or read by other participants in the meeting substantially concurrently with the making of those remarks; and

If otherwise entitled, vote on matters submitted to the members.

Participating in a meeting by this means constitutes presence at the meeting in person or by proxy if all of the other requirements of section 10-33-77 are met.

With respect to notice to members:

Any notice to members given by the corporation under any provision of this chapter, the articles, or the bylaws by a form of electronic communication consented to by the member to whom the notice is given is effective when given. The notice is deemed given:

If by facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which the member has consented to receive notice;

If by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the member has consented to receive notice;

If by a posting on an electronic network on which the member has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the member of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice; and

If by any other form of electronic communication by which the member has consented to receive notice, when directed to the member.

An affidavit of the secretary, other authorized officer, or authorized agent of the corporation, that the notice has been given by a form of electronic communication is, in the absence of fraud, prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the affidavit.

Consent by a member to notice given by electronic communication may be given in writing or by authenticated electronic communication. The corporation is entitled to rely on any consent so given until revoked by the member, provided that no revocation affects the validity of any notice given before receipt by the corporation of revocation of the consent.

Any ballot, vote, authorization, or consent submitted by electronic communication under this chapter may be revoked by the member submitting the ballot, vote authorization, or consent so long as the revocation is received by an officer of the corporation at or before the meeting or before an action without a meeting is effective according to section 10-33-73.

Waiver of notice by a member of a meeting by means of authenticated electronic communication may be given in the manner provided in subsection 5 of section 10-33-68. Participation in a meeting by means of remote communication described in subdivisions a and b of subsection 2 is a waiver of notice of that meeting, except when the member objects:

At the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened; or

Before a vote on an item of business because the item may not lawfully be considered at the meeting and does not participate in the consideration of the item at that meeting.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 105; 2021, ch. 87, § 1, effective April 1, 2021.

10-33-76.
Quorum of members.

Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws, a quorum for a meeting of members is ten percent of the members entitled to vote at the meeting.

Except as provided in subdivision b, a quorum is necessary for the transaction of business at a meeting of members.

If a quorum is not present, a meeting may be adjourned from time to time for that reason.

If a quorum has been present at a meeting and members have withdrawn from the meeting so that less than a quorum remains, the members still present may continue to transact business until adjournment.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-77.
Proxies.

If the articles or bylaws permit proxy voting, a member may cast or authorize the casting of a vote by:

Filing a nonelectronic written appointment of a proxy signed by the member, with an officer of a corporation at or before the meeting at which the appointment is to be effective; or

Telephonic transmission or authenticated electronic communication whether or not accompanied by written instructions of the member, of an appointment of a proxy with the corporation or the corporation’s duly authorized agent at or before the meeting at which the appointment is to be effective.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for eleven months unless a different period is expressly provided in the appointment. However, a proxy is not valid for more than three years from its date of execution.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the member. Appointment of a proxy is revoked by the person appointing the proxy by attending a meeting and voting in person, or signing and delivering to the officer or agent authorized to tabulate proxy votes either a writing stating that the appointment of the proxy is revoked, or a later appointment. Revocation in either manner revokes all prior proxy appointments and is effective when filed with an officer of the corporation.

The death or incapacity of the member appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the authority of the proxy unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by an officer authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises authority under the appointment.

Subject to section 10-33-78 and an express limitation on the authority of the proxy appearing on the face of the appointment form, a corporation is entitled to accept the vote or other action of the proxy as that of the member making the appointment.

The vote of a proxy is final, binding, and not subject to challenge, but the proxy is liable to the member for damages resulting from a failure to exercise the proxy or from an exercise of the proxy in violation of the authority granted in the appointment.

Unless the appointment specifically provides otherwise, if two or more persons are appointed as proxies for a member, any one of them may vote on each item of business in accordance with specific instructions contained in the appointment, but if no specific instructions are contained in the appointment with respect to voting on a particular item of business, a majority of the proxies have the authority conferred by the instrument. If the proxies are equally divided, they share the vote equally.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 106.

10-33-78.
Acceptance of member act by the corporation.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the record name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith may accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, if the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the record name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith may accept the vote, consent waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member if:

The member is an organization and the name signed purports to be that of an officer, manager, or agent of the organization;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, guardian, or conservator representing the member and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the member, and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney in fact of the member and if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the member has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment; or

Two or more persons hold the membership as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one of the coholders and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the coholders.

The corporation may reject a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory’s authority to sign for the member.

The corporation or its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section is not liable in damages to the member for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-79.
Voting agreements.

To the extent permitted in the articles or bylaws, two or more members may provide for how they will vote by signing an agreement for that purpose. An agreement may be valid for a period of up to ten years. The agreement must have a reasonable purpose consistent with the purposes of the corporation.

A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

A voting agreement is not effective until it is filed with the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-80.
Books and records — Financial statement.

A corporation shall keep at its principal executive office correct and complete copies of its articles and bylaws, accounting records, voting agreements, and minutes of meetings of members, board of directors, and committees having any of the authority of the board of directors for the last six years.

A member or a director, or the agent or attorney of a member or a director, may inspect all records referred to in subsection 1 or 3 for any proper purpose at any reasonable time. A proper purpose is one reasonably related to the interest of the person as a member or director of the corporation.

Upon request, a corporation shall give the member or the director a statement showing the financial result of all operations and transactions affecting income and surplus during its last annual accounting period and a balance sheet containing a summary of its assets and liabilities as of the closing date of the accounting period.

A member or director who has gained access under this section to any corporate record may not use or furnish to another for use the corporate record or a portion of the contents for any purpose other than a proper purpose. Upon application of the corporation, a court may issue a protective order or order other relief as may be necessary to enforce the provisions of this subsection.

The corporation may charge the requesting party a reasonable fee to cover the expenses of providing copies of records under this section.

The records maintained by a corporation may use any information storage technique, even though the technique makes them illegible visually, if the records can be converted accurately and within a reasonable time into a form that is legible visually and whose contents are assembled by related subject matter to permit convenient use by people in the normal course of business. A corporation shall convert any of the records referred to in subsection 1 or 3 upon the request of a person entitled to inspect them with the expense of the conversion being borne by the person who bears the expense of copying under subsection 5. A copy of the conversion is admissible in evidence, and must be accepted for all other purposes, to the same extent as the existing or original records would be if they were legible visually.

A member or a director who is wrongfully denied access to or copies of records under this section may bring an action for injunctive relief, damages, and costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 107.

10-33-81.
Equitable remedies for members.

If a corporation or an officer or director of the corporation violates this chapter, a court in this state, in an action brought by at least fifty members with voting rights or ten percent of the members with voting rights, whichever is less, or by the attorney general, may grant equitable relief it considers just and reasonable in the circumstances and award expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees and disbursements to the members. The court may award the attorney general reasonable attorney’s fees, investigation fees, costs, and expenses of any investigation and action brought by the attorney general under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 107.

10-33-82.
Loans — Guarantees — Suretyship.

Except as provided in subsection 2, a corporation may lend money to, guarantee or pledge its assets as security for an obligation of, become a surety for, or otherwise financially assist a person, if the transaction, or a class of transactions to which the transaction belongs, is approved by the board and:

Is in the usual and regular course of activities of the corporation;

Is with, or for the benefit of:

A related organization;

An organization in which the corporation has a financial interest;

A person or organization with whom the corporation has a relationship in the usual and regular course of its activities; or

An organization to which the corporation has the power to make donations; or

Has been approved by:

Two-thirds of the members with voting rights; or

If there is no member with voting rights, by two-thirds of the board.

A corporation may not lend money to or guarantee the obligation of a director or officer of the corporation or a related organization, or of the spouse, parents, children and spouses of children, brothers and sisters or spouses of brothers and sisters of the director or officer.

If a loan or guarantee is made in violation of this section, the borrower’s liability on the loan is not affected.

The directors of a corporation who vote for or assent to the making of a loan to a director or officer of the corporation, or who vote for or assent to the guarantee of the obligation of a director or officer of the corporation, and any officer participating in the making of such loan or guarantee shall be jointly and severally liable to the corporation for the amount of the loan until its repayment.

This subsection does not prohibit an advance of money for expenses authorized by section 10-33-83.

A loan, guarantee, surety contract, or other financial assistance under subsection 1 or 2 may be with or without interest and may be unsecured or secured.

This section does not grant authority to act as a bank or to carry on the business of banking.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-83.
Advances.

A corporation, without a vote of the directors or its members, may advance money to its directors, officers, employees, or agents to cover expenses that can reasonably be anticipated to be incurred by them in the performance of their duties and for which they would be entitled to reimbursement in the absence of an advance.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-84.
Indemnification.

For purposes of this section:

“Corporation” includes a domestic or foreign corporation that was the predecessor of the corporation referred to in this section in a merger or other transaction in which the predecessor’s existence ceased upon consummation of the transaction.

“Official capacity” means:

With respect to a director, the position of director in a corporation;

With respect to a person other than a director, the elective or appointive office or position held by an officer, member of a committee of the board, or the employment relationship undertaken by an employee of the corporation; and

With respect to a director, officer, or employee of the corporation who, while a director, officer, or employee of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation or whose duties in that position involve or involved service as a director, governor, officer, manager, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another organization or employee benefit plan, the position of that person as a director, governor, officer, manager, partner, trustee, employee, or agent, as the case may be, of the other organization or employee benefit plan.

“Proceeding” means a threatened, pending, or completed civil, criminal, administrative, arbitration, or investigative proceeding, including a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation.

“Special legal counsel” means counsel who has not in the preceding five years:

Represented the corporation or a related organization in any capacity other than special legal counsel; or

Represented a director, officer, member of a committee of the board, or employee whose indemnification is in issue.

Subject to subsection 5, a corporation shall indemnify a person made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding by reason of the former or present official capacity of the person against judgments, penalties, fines including excise taxes assessed against the person with respect to an employee benefit plan, settlements, and reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by the person in connection with the proceeding, if, with respect to the acts or omissions of the person complained of in the proceeding, the person:

Has not been indemnified by another organization or employee benefit plan for the same judgments, penalties, fines including excise taxes assessed against the person with respect to an employee benefit plan, settlements, and reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by the person in connection with the proceeding with respect to the same acts or omissions;

Acted in good faith;

Received no improper personal benefit and section 10-33-45, if applicable, has been satisfied;

In the case of a criminal proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe the conduct was unlawful; and

In the case of acts or omissions occurring in the official capacity described in paragraph 1 or 2 of subdivision b of subsection 1, reasonably believed that the conduct was in the best interests of the corporation, or in the case of acts or omissions occurring in the official capacity described in paragraph 3 of subdivision b of subsection 1, reasonably believed that the conduct was not opposed to the best interests of the corporation. If the person’s acts or omissions complained of in the proceeding relate to conduct as a director, governor, officer, manager, trustee, employee, or agent of an employee benefit plan, the conduct is not considered to be opposed to the best interests of the corporation if the person reasonably believed that the conduct was in the best interests of the participants or beneficiaries of the employee benefit plan.

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent does not, of itself, establish that the person did not meet the criteria set forth in subsection 2.

Subject to subsection 5, if a person is made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding, the person is entitled, upon written request to the corporation, to payment or reimbursement by the corporation of reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by the person in advance of the final disposition of the proceeding:

Upon receipt by the corporation of a written affirmation by the person of a good-faith belief that the criteria for indemnification set forth in subsection 2 have been satisfied and a written undertaking by the person to repay all amounts so paid or reimbursed by the corporation, if it is ultimately determined that the criteria for indemnification have not been satisfied; and

After a determination that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this section.

The articles or bylaws may prohibit indemnification or advances of expenses otherwise required by this section or may impose conditions on indemnification or advances of expenses in addition to the conditions contained in subsections 2, 3, and 4, including monetary limits on indemnification or advances for expenses, if the prohibition conditions apply equally to all persons or to all persons within a given class. A prohibition or limit on indemnification or advances may not apply to or affect the right of a person to indemnification or advances of expenses with respect to any acts or omissions of the person occurring before the effective date of a provision in the articles or the date of adoption of a provision in the bylaws establishing the prohibition or limit on indemnification or advances.

This section does not require, or limit the ability of, a corporation to reimburse expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by a person in connection with an appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the person has not been made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding.

All determinations whether indemnification of a person is required because the criteria provided in subsection 2 have been satisfied and whether a person is entitled to payment or reimbursement of expenses in advance of the final disposition of a proceeding as provided in subsection 4 must be made:

By the board by a majority of a quorum, if the directors who are at the time parties to the proceeding are not counted for determining either a majority or the presence of a quorum;

If a quorum under subdivision a cannot be obtained by a majority of a committee of the board, consisting solely of two or more directors not at the time parties to the proceeding, duly designated to act in the matter by a majority of the full board, including directors who are parties;

If a determination is not made under subdivision a or b, by special legal counsel, selected either by a majority of the board or a committee by vote pursuant to subdivision a or b or, if the requisite quorum of the full board cannot be obtained and the committee cannot be established, by a majority of the full board, including directors who are parties;

If a determination is not made under subdivisions a, b, and c, by the members with voting rights, other than members who are a party to the proceeding; or

If an adverse determination is made under subdivisions a through d, or under subsection 8, or if no determination is made under subdivisions a through d, or under subsection 8, within sixty days after:

The later to occur of the termination of a proceeding or a written request for indemnification to the corporation; or

A request for an advance of expenses, as the case may be, by a court in this state, which may be the same court in which the proceeding involving the person’s liability took place, upon application of the person and any notice the court requires.

With respect to a person who is not, and who was not at the time of the acts or omissions complained of in the proceedings, a director, officer, or person possessing, directly or indirectly, the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of the corporation, the determination whether indemnification of this person is required because the criteria set forth in subsection 2 have been satisfied and whether this person is entitled to payment or reimbursement of expenses in advance of the final disposition of a proceeding as provided in subsection 4 may be made by an annually appointed committee of the board, having at least one member who is a director. The committee shall report at least annually to the board concerning its actions.

A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a person in that person’s official capacity against any liability asserted against and incurred by the person in or arising from that capacity, whether or not the corporation would have been required to indemnify the person against the liability under this section.

A corporation with members with voting rights that indemnifies or advances expenses to a person in accordance with this section in connection with a proceeding by or on behalf of the corporation shall report to the members in writing the amount of the indemnification or advance and to whom and on whose behalf it was paid not later than the next meeting of members.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the power of the corporation to indemnify persons other than a director, an officer, an employee, or a member of a committee of the board by contract or otherwise.

The written undertaking required by subdivision a is an unlimited general obligation of the person making it, but need not be secured and shall be accepted without reference to financial ability to make the repayment.

The person seeking indemnification or payment or reimbursement of expenses pursuant to this subdivision has the burden of establishing that the person is entitled to indemnification or payment or reimbursement of expenses.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 140; 2009, ch. 106, § 52; 2011, ch. 87, § 55.

10-33-85.
Merger, consolidation, or transfer.

Two or more corporations may merge or consolidate, resulting in a single corporation subject to this chapter. A merger or consolidation must be made as provided in sections 10-33-86 through 10-33-92.

A corporation may sell, lease, transfer, or dispose of all or substantially all of its property and assets under section 10-33-94.

If applicable, a corporation shall comply with sections 10-33-122 and 10-33-144 before the corporation may merge, consolidate, sell, lease, transfer, or dispose of all or substantially all of the corporation’s assets.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 97, § 1.

10-33-86.
Plan of merger or consolidation.

A plan of merger or consolidation must contain:

The names of the corporations proposing to merge or consolidate;

The name of the surviving or new corporation;

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger or consolidation;

In the case of a merger, the manner and basis of converting the memberships of the constituent corporations into memberships of the surviving corporation or of any other corporation;

In the case of a merger, a statement of amendments to the articles of the surviving corporation proposed as part of the merger;

In the case of a consolidation, the provisions required by section 10-33-06 to be set out in the articles of the new corporation; and

Other provisions with respect to the proposed merger or consolidation which are considered necessary or desirable.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-87.
Plan approval.

A plan of merger or consolidation must be approved and adopted by each constituent corporation as provided in this section.

If a constituent corporation has members with voting rights with respect to mergers and consolidations as required by section 10-33-42, the board of directors of the corporation shall adopt a resolution by the affirmative vote of a majority of all directors approving a proposed plan of merger or consolidation and directing that the plan be submitted to a vote at a meeting of the members with voting rights. Notice of the meeting must be given to each member with voting rights, accompanied by a copy or summary of the proposed plan. Unless the articles or bylaws require a greater vote, the plan of merger or consolidation is adopted upon receiving the affirmative vote of a majority of the members with voting rights voting on the action.

When a constituent corporation does not have a member with voting rights and unless the articles or bylaws require a greater vote, a plan of merger or consolidation is adopted at a meeting of the board of directors of the corporation upon receiving the affirmative votes of a majority of all directors. Notice of the meeting must be given to all directors accompanied by a copy of the proposed plan of merger or consolidation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 141; 2011, ch. 87, § 56.

10-33-88.
Articles of merger or consolidation — Certificate.

Upon receiving the approval required by section 10-33-87 and after compliance with section 10-33-122 and section 10-33-144, if applicable, articles of merger or consolidation must be prepared that contain:

The plan of merger or consolidation;

A statement that the plan has been approved by each corporation under this chapter; and

A statement that the notice to the attorney general required by section 10-33-122 or 10-33-144 has been given and the waiting period has expired or has been waived by the attorney general or a statement that section 10-33-122 or 10-33-144 is not applicable.

The articles of merger or consolidation must be signed on behalf of each constituent corporation and filed with the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall issue a certificate of merger to the surviving corporation or its legal representative or a certificate of consolidation and incorporation to the new corporation. The certificate must contain the effective date of merger or consolidation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 97, § 2.